Louisiana, session 2026, HB216.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 1313(E) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 1313. Service by mail, delivery, or electronic means
* * *
E. At the onset of a case, counsel of record may inform the court of the
counsel's preferred method of service for all future pleadings for the case at hand.